District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

33-111.02

Statement of foreign qualification.

Repealed.

History

Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-234, § 1102, 44 DCR 777
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(x), 58 DCR 1720

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 41-161.2.